spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.aff
SFX J N 88
SFX J   ök   ül           ök
SFX J   ök   iül          ök
SFX J   ök   iért         ök
SFX J   ök   ivé          ök
SFX J   ök   ivel         ök
SFX J   ök   itől         ök
SFX J   ök   it           ök
SFX J   ök   iről         ök
SFX J   ök   ire          ök
SFX J   ök   inél         ök
SFX J   ök   inek         ök
SFX J   ök   in           ök
SFX J   ök   ileg         ök
SFX J   ök   iként        ök
SFX J   ök   ikor         ök
SFX J   ök   iig          ök
SFX J   ök   ihez         ök
SFX J   ök   iből         ök
SFX J   ök   iben         ök
SFX J   ök   ibe          ök
SFX J   ök   i            ök
SFX J   ok   ul           ok
SFX J   ok   iért         ok
SFX J   ok   ivá          ok
SFX J   ok   ival         ok
SFX J   ok   iul          ok
SFX J   ok   itól         ok
SFX J   ok   it           ok
SFX J   ok   iról         ok
SFX J   ok   ira          ok
SFX J   ok   inál         ok
SFX J   ok   inak         ok
SFX J   ok   in           ok
SFX J   ok   ilag         ok
SFX J   ok   iként        ok
SFX J   ok   ikor         ok
SFX J   ok   iig          ok
SFX J   ok   ihoz         ok
SFX J   ok   iból         ok
SFX J   ok   iban         ok
SFX J   ok   iba          ok
SFX J   ok   i            ok
SFX J   k    n            [^a]k
SFX J   ek   ül           ek
SFX J   ek   iül          ek
SFX J   ek   iért         ek
SFX J   ek   ivé          ek
SFX J   ek   ivel         ek
SFX J   ek   itől         ek
SFX J   ek   it           ek
SFX J   ek   iről         ek
SFX J   ek   ire          ek
SFX J   ek   inél         ek
SFX J   ek   inek         ek
SFX J   ek   in           ek
SFX J   ek   ileg         ek
SFX J   ek   iként        ek
SFX J   ek   ikor         ek
SFX J   ek   iig          ek
SFX J   ek   ihez         ek
SFX J   ek   iből         ek
SFX J   ek   iben         ek
SFX J   ek   ibe          ek
SFX J   ek   i            ek
SFX J   ak   ul           ak
SFX J   ak   on           ak
SFX J   ak   iért         ak
SFX J   ak   ivá          ak
SFX J   ak   ival         ak
SFX J   ak   iul          ak
SFX J   ak   itól         ak
SFX J   ak   it           ak
SFX J   ak   iról         ak
SFX J   ak   ira          ak
SFX J   ak   inál         ak
SFX J   ak   inak         ak
SFX J   ak   in           ak
SFX J   ak   ilag         ak
SFX J   ak   iként        ak
SFX J   ak   ikor         ak
SFX J   ak   iig          ak
SFX J   ak   ihoz         ak
SFX J   ak   iból         ak
SFX J   ak   iban         ak
SFX J   ak   iba          ak
SFX J   ak   i            ak
SFX J   0    ott          hat
SFX J   0    ett          het
