spellchecker-languagepack-hungarian/dicts/hu_HU.dic
ürültethet/JXEeX
ügyködhet/JXEX
újultathat/OoXJX
összeérhet/JE
összecsatolódtathat/OoXJX
öntöztethet/JXEeX
öltögethet/JXEeX
öblösíthet/JXEeX
óvakodhat/OXJX
ítélkezhet/JXEX
észrevevődtethet/JXEeX
értékteleníttethet/JXEeX
érintkezhet/JXEeX
énekelhet/JXEeX
élenjártathat/OoXJX
éjjelezhet/JXEX
átélhet/JEe
ásítozhat/OXJX
árendálhat/OoXJX
álmélkodhat/OXJX
állapíttathat/OoXJX
ágaztathat/OoXJX
zötyögtettethet/JXEeX
zökkenhet/JXEX
zupálhat/OoXJX
zsákvásznak/IJY
zsinegeltethet/JXEeX
zsarnokoskodhat/OXJX
zenebonázhat/OoXOXJX
zabpelyhek/IJY
vízhatlaníttathat/OoXJX
véníttethet/JXEeX
végigböngészhet/JXEeX
ványolódhat/OoXJX
válhat/OXJX
vonóhorgok/IJY
vonalazhat/OoXJX
vitázhat/OoXOXJX
visszleszámítoltathat/OoXJX
virágkelyhek/IJY
villogattathat/OoXJX
vigyoroghat/OXJX
viaszosvásznak/IJY
vetemedhet/JXEX
versengtethet/JXEeX
ventilálhat/OoXJX
vastagíttathat/OoXJX
vakációztathat/OoXJX
vagonoztathat/OoXJX
uzsoráskodhat/OXJX
utalványozhat/OoXJX
unalmaskodhat/OXJX
tüzeltethet/JXEeX
tűzködhet/JXEeX
törülköztethet/JXEeX
törhet/JXEeXEX
tömörödhet/JXEeX
többszöröztethet/JXEeX
tétlenkedhet/JXEX
ténylegesíttethet/JXEeX
táthat/OoXJX
táplálkoztathat/OoXJX
tájolhat/OoXJX
turházhat/OoXJX
tudakolódzhat/OXJX
tromfoltathat/OoXJX
trancsíroztathat/OoXJX
torpanhat/OXJX
tombolhat/OXJX
tokozódhat/OXJX
titkok/IJY
tilthat/OoXJX
tetvesedhet/JXEX
tervezgethet/JXEeX
terhelődhet/JXEeX
tengődhet/JXEX
telexeztethet/JXEeX
tekerhet/JXEeX
taszajthat/OoXJX
tarisznyázhat/OoXOXJX
tapaszthat/OoXJX
tankolhat/OXJX
takaríttathat/OoXJX
süvegelhet/JXEeX
süketeltethet/JXEeX
sörözhet/JXEX
síbolhat/OoXJX
sápítoztathat/OoXJX
szüneteltethet/JXEeX
szöszöltethet/JXEeX
szőrözhet/JXEeX
szólongathat/OXJX
színeztethet/JXEeX
széleszthet/JXEeX
szárnyaltathat/OoXJX
számítgattathat/OoXJX
szállingóztathat/OoXJX
szusszanthat/OoXJX
szuggeráltathat/OoXJX
szorulhat/OXJX
szomorodhat/OXJX
szivattyúztathat/OoXJX
szinkópáltathat/OoXJX
szigorodtathat/OoXJX
szervírozhat/OoXJX
szerelmeskedhet/JXEX
szennabokrok/IJY
szemlélhet/JXEeX
szelhet/JXEeX
szegényedhet/JXEX
szavazhat/OoXJX
szaporulhat/OXJX
szaladtathat/OoXJX
szagolgattathat/OoXJX
szabadalmaztattathat/OoXJX
summázhat/OoXJX
studíroztathat/OoXJX
steppelhet/JXEeX
spurizhet/JXEeX
sorvadozhat/OXJX
sokasíthat/OoXJX
slattyogtathat/OoXJX
sinkófálhat/OoXJX
sikonghat/OXJX
serkentethet/JXEeX
selypíthet/JXEeX
sebesíthet/JXEeX
sarjadhat/OXJX
saccoltathat/OoXJX
röpíthet/JXEeX
rókászhat/OXJX
részegeskedhet/JXEX
ráreppentethet/JXEeX
rálőcsölhet/JXEeX
ruhakapcsok/IJY
rovatolhat/OoXJX
rongálódhat/OXJX
rohangálhat/OXJX
ritkíthat/OoXJX
rigolíroztathat/OoXJX
rezegtettethet/JXEeX
reszteltethet/JXEeX
repetáztathat/OoXJX
rendszabályozhat/OoXJX
rekrutálódtathat/OoXJX
rejtezhet/JXEeX
referálhat/OoXJX
reagálhat/OoXJX
rajztathat/OoXJX
radírozhat/OoXJX
pörösködhet/JXEeX
pöckök/IJY
példálództathat/OoXJX
párologhat/OXJX
pácoltathat/OoXJX
pukkasztathat/OoXJX
pucoltathat/OoXJX
provideáltathat/OoXJX
profiloztathat/OoXJX
predesztináltathat/OoXJX
portyázhat/OXJX
pontifikáltathat/OoXJX
poharazgathat/OoXJX
pletykálhat/OoXJX
piszkolhat/OXJX
pipázhat/OoXOXJX
pihiztethet/JXEeX
pettyeztethet/JXEeX
pergettethet/JXEeX
pengettethet/JXEeX
pecsételtethet/JXEeX
pasztőröztethet/JXEeX
parkozhat/OoXJX
papizhat/OoXJX
palatalizálódhat/OoXJX
oxidálódhat/OXJX
ostromoltathat/OoXJX
ordíthat/OoXJX
olvastattathat/OoXJX
okádhat/OoXJX
odábbállhat/OXJX
nődögélhet/JXEX
nélkülözhet/JXEeX
nyúlkáltathat/OoXJX
nyáladztathat/OoXJX
nyomultathat/OoXJX
nyitódtathat/OoXJX
nyikoroghat/OXJX
nyeldekelhet/JXEeX
nyakfodrok/IJY
nittelhet/JXEeX
nemesbíttethet/JXEeX
navigáltathat/OoXJX
nagyolhat/OoXJX
múlattathat/OoXJX
mérsékelődhet/JXEeX
mélázhat/OoXOXJX
márványozhat/OoXJX
mutáltathat/OoXJX
mulaszthat/OoXJX
motolláltathat/OoXJX
mormoghat/OoXJX
modernizálhat/OoXJX
militarizálhat/OoXJX
merevíttethet/JXEeX
menekültethet/JXEeX
mekeghet/JXEX
megszigorodtathat/OoXJX
megkönnyültethet/JXEeX
megegyeztethet/JXEeX
meakulpáztathat/OoXJX
masináltathat/OoXJX
marasztaltathat/OoXJX
makadámoztathat/OoXJX
magoztathat/OoXJX
lúdbőröztethet/JXEeX
lóversenyezhet/JXEX
létesültethet/JXEeX
léghajózhat/OoXJX
lámpáztathat/OoXJX
lubickolhat/OXJX
lomhultathat/OoXJX
litografálhat/OoXJX
libeghet/JXEX
letörülhet/JXEeX
leplek/IJY
lelomboztathat/OoXJX
lejthet/JXEX
legyezgethet/JXEeX
lecsöndesíthet/JXEeX
lazúroztathat/OoXJX
lapátolhat/OoXJX
langyosodhat/OXJX
laboráltathat/OoXJX
küldözgettethet/JXEeX
központosulhat/OXJX
kövesíthet/JXEeX
köröztettethet/JXEeX
köpeszthet/JXEeX
költethet/JXEeX
kóstolgattathat/OoXJX
kísérgettethet/JXEeX
kétszínűsködhet/JXEX
késedelmezhet/JXEeX
kérdethet/JXEeX
kényszeredhet/JXEX
kászálódhat/OXJX
kápráztattathat/OoXJX
kvadráltathat/OoXJX
kuruzsoltathat/OoXJX
kunyerálhat/OoXJX
kuksolhat/OXJX
krokettezhet/JXEeX
kottáztathat/OoXJX
koszoltathat/OoXJX
korrigálhat/OoXJX
korholhat/OoXJX
kopogtattathat/OoXJX
konvergáltathat/OoXJX
konstatálhat/OoXJX
kondíttathat/OoXJX
komprimálhat/OoXJX
komissiózhat/OXJX
koholhat/OoXJX
knockoutolhat/OoXJX
kiálthat/OoXJX
kisebbíttethet/JXEeX
kimezsgyézhet/JXEeX
kihalhat/OJ
kicsúcsosodhat/OoXJX
kibarkáztathat/OoXJX
kevergethet/JXEeX
kertesíthet/JXEeX
keresgéltethet/JXEeX
keményíttethet/JXEeX
kegyeskedhet/JXEX
kavicsoztathat/OoXJX
kasztráltathat/OoXJX
karikásodhat/OoXJX
kaprok/IJY
kapacitáltathat/OoXJX
kampósodhat/OoXJX
kalapoztathat/OoXJX
kacsoltathat/OoXJX
jósoltathat/OoXJX
járulhat/OoXJX
jelölhet/JXEeX
javítódhat/OXJX
izzathat/OoXJX
iteráltathat/OoXJX
ismertethet/JXEeX
irizálhat/OXJX
intézvényeztethet/JXEeX
instáltathat/OoXJX
ingerelhet/JXEeX
indigóztathat/OoXJX
immunizáltathat/OoXJX
ijeszthet/JXEeX
igazoltathat/OoXJX
idegesíttethet/JXEeX
hűsölhet/JXEX
hömpölyöghet/JXEX
hízelegtethet/JXEeX
házasíttathat/OoXJX
hánytathat/OoXJX
háboroghat/OXJX
hunyhat/OoXJX
hozzátörülhet/JXEeX
horholtathat/OoXJX
homályosulhat/OXJX
hitegettethet/JXEeX
hidegültethet/JXEeX
heteltethet/JXEeX
hentereghet/JXEX
helyezhet/JXEeX
hebeteltethet/JXEeX
határoltathat/OoXJX
hasonulhat/OXJX
harcolhat/OoXJX
hangszereltethet/JXEeX
hamizhet/JXEeX
hallgattathat/OoXJX
hajthat/OoXJX
hajbókoltathat/OoXJX
habilitálhat/OoXJX
gördíthet/JXEeX
gőgösködtethet/JXEeX
gányoltathat/OoXJX
gyűlölködhet/JXEX
gyöngyöztethet/JXEeX
gyéríthet/JXEeX
gyilkoltathat/OoXJX
gyanakodhat/OXJX
guggoltattathat/OoXJX
gornyadozhat/OXJX
golyóztathat/OoXJX
gereblyézhet/JXEeX
gazdasszonykodhat/OXJX
galandférgek/IJY
fürjésztethet/JXEeX
fűrészeltethet/JXEeX
fölöztethet/JXEeX
fölbizsuztathat/OoXJX
férfiatlaníthat/OoXJX
féktelenkedhet/JXEX
fájathat/OoXJX
furulyáltathat/OoXJX
fugázhat/OoXJX
fragmentálhat/OoXJX
forraszthat/OoXJX
fordultathat/OoXJX
folyamodhat/OXJX
fogyókúráztathat/OoXJX
fogalmazhat/OoXJX
fiúsíthat/OoXJX
fintorgathat/OoXJX
figuráztathat/OoXJX
feszegettethet/JXEeX
fenyegetődztethet/JXEeX
felreppentethet/JXEeX
felfüggesztődhet/JXEeX
feldobódhat/OoXJX
fejhet/JXEeX
fecserészhet/JXEeX
faraghat/OoXJX
fakasztathat/OoXJX
facsarodhat/OXJX
exkuzálhat/OoXJX
eszményíthet/JXEeX
erősítgethet/JXEeX
eregethet/JXEeX
engesztelhet/JXEeX
emelgettethet/JXEeX
elérzékenyedtethet/JXEeX
eltorlaszolódhat/OoXJX
elslattyoghat/OoXJX
elodázhat/OoXJX
ellenforradalmak/IJY
elhidegíthet/JXEeX
eleveníttethet/JXEeX
elcsellóztathat/OoXJX
ehet/JXEeX
egyesülhet/JXEX
eddegéltethet/JXEeX
dühíthet/JXEeX
dörgölődzhet/JXEX
döfködtethet/JXEeX
dévánkoztathat/OoXJX
durrogtattathat/OoXJX
dugványozhat/OoXJX
drukkoltathat/OoXJX
domborultathat/OoXJX
dobolhat/OoXJX
diszkreditáltathat/OoXJX
digitalizálhat/OoXJX
dezignálhat/OoXJX
deríttethet/JXEeX
denaturálhat/OoXJX
deklináltathat/OoXJX
deferálhat/OoXJX
danászhat/OoXJX
cérnázhat/OoXJX
csülkök/IJY
csúfolkodhat/OXJX
csöndesíttethet/JXEeX
csókolózhat/OXJX
csutakoltathat/OoXJX
csomóztathat/OoXJX
csillézhet/JXEeX
cserélgettethet/JXEeX
csempészhet/JXEeX
csalódhat/OXJX
cineztethet/JXEeX
cementálhat/OoXJX
búbolhat/OoXJX
bírálhat/OoXJX
bámultathat/OoXJX
bukhat/OXJX
botolhat/OoXJX
bontogattathat/OoXJX
bogozhat/OoXJX
bitangolhat/OXJX
betegedhet/JXEX
beleírhat/OoJ
behegesedhet/JXEeX
batikolhat/OoXJX
babusgattathat/OoXJX
arányíttathat/OoXJX
antennatornyok/IJY
altathat/OoXJX
akóztathat/OoXJX
ajnározhat/OoXJX
acélozhat/OoXJX
